Utah statutes.
10-9a-201.   Required notice.

(1)  At a minimum, each municipality shall provide actual notice or the notice required by this part.

(2)  A municipality may by ordinance require greater notice than required under this part.



Enacted by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

